Washington statutes.
RCW 35.84.050

Firefighter injured outside corporate limits.

Whenever a firefighter engages in any duty outside the limits of such municipality, such duty shall be considered as part of his or her duty as firefighter for the municipality, and a firefighter who is injured while engaged in such duties outside the limits of the municipality shall be entitled to the same benefits that he or she or his or her family would be entitled to receive had he or she been injured within the municipality.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2127; 1965 c 7 s 35.84.050. Prior: 1941 c 96 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9563-1.]